Alaska statutes. Title 26. Military Affairs, Veterans, Disasters, and Aerospace.
Article 2. Military Justice.
Sec. 26.05.765.
Failure to obey order or regulation.

Any member of the militia who (1) violates or fails to obey a lawful general order or regulation, (2) having knowledge of any other lawful order issued by a member of the militia of the state that the member has a duty to obey, fails to obey the order, or (3) is derelict in the performance of the member’s duties may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.592; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.767.
Impersonation of officer, noncommissioned officer, petty officer, agent, or official.

A member of the militia who wrongfully and wilfully impersonates (1) an officer, noncommissioned officer, or petty officer, (2) an agent of superior authority of one of the armed forces of the United States or of the militia of the state, or (3) an official of a government shall be punished as a court-martial may direct.

A member of the militia who wrongfully, wilfully, and with intent to defraud impersonates (1) an officer, noncommissioned officer, or petty officer, (2) an agent of superior authority of one of the armed forces of the United States or of the militia of the state, or (3) an official of a government may be punished by up to three years of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

A member of the militia who wrongfully, wilfully, and without intent to defraud impersonates an official of a government by committing an act that exercises or asserts the authority of the office that the person claims to have may be punished by up to six months of confinement, by separation with characterization up to bad-conduct discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 17 ch 85 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 46,
ch. 85, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 26.05.768.
Wearing unauthorized insignia, decoration, badge, ribbon, device, or lapel button.

A member of the militia who wears on the member’s uniform or civilian clothing an insignia, decoration, badge, ribbon, device, or lapel button that the member is not authorized to wear may be punished by up to six months of confinement, by separation with characterization up to bad-conduct discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 17 ch 85 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 46,
ch. 85, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 26.05.770.
Cruelty and maltreatment.

A member of the militia who is guilty of cruelty toward, or oppression or maltreatment of, another person subject to the member’s orders may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.593; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.775.
Mutiny or sedition.

A member of the militia is guilty of mutiny if the member, with intent to usurp or override lawful military authority, refuses, in concert with another person, to obey orders or otherwise do the member’s duty or creates violence or a disturbance.

A member of the militia is guilty of sedition if the member, with intent to cause the overthrow or destruction of lawful civil authority, creates, in concert with another person, revolt, violence, or other disturbance against the authority.

A member of the militia is guilty of a failure to suppress or report a mutiny or sedition if the member fails to do the member’s utmost to prevent and suppress a mutiny or sedition being committed in the member’s presence or fails to take all reasonable means to inform the member’s superior commissioned officer or commanding officer of a mutiny or sedition that the member knows or has reason to believe is taking place.

A member who is found guilty of mutiny, sedition, or failure to suppress or report a mutiny or sedition under this section may be punished by up to 10 years of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.594; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.780.
Resistance, flight, breach of arrest, and escape.

A member of the militia who (1) resists apprehension, (2) flees from apprehension, (3) breaks arrest, or (4) escapes from custody or confinement may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.595

; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.785.
Releasing prisoner without proper authority; drinking or using drugs with prisoner.

A member of the militia who, without proper authority, releases a prisoner committed to the member’s charge or, through neglect or design, suffers a prisoner to escape may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct, whether or not the prisoner was committed in strict compliance with law.

A member of the militia who unlawfully drinks an alcoholic beverage with a prisoner or unlawfully uses a drug with a prisoner may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-marshal may direct, whether or not the prisoner was committed in strict compliance with law.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016; am § 18 ch 85 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.596; renumbered in 2016.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, added (b).

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.790.
Unlawful detention.

A member of the militia who, except as provided by law or regulation, apprehends, arrests, or confines another person may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.597; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.793.
Wrongful interference with adverse administrative proceeding.

A member of the militia who, having reason to believe that an adverse administrative proceeding is pending against a person subject to this chapter, wrongfully acts with the intent to influence, impede, or obstruct the conduct of the proceeding or otherwise obstruct the due administration of justice may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 19 ch 85 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 46,
ch. 85, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 26.05.795.
Noncompliance with procedural rules.

A member of the militia who knowingly and intentionally

is responsible for unnecessary delay in the disposition of the case of another person accused of an offense under this chapter may be punished by up to six months of confinement, by separation with characterization up to a bad conduct discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct; or

fails to enforce or comply with a provision of this chapter regulating the proceedings before, during, or after trial of an accused may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.598; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.796.
Wrongful refusal to testify.

A member of the militia who, during a preliminary hearing or in the presence of a court-martial, board of officers, military commission, court of inquiry, or officer taking a deposition of or for the state, wrongfully refuses to qualify as a witness or answer a question after having been directed to do so by the person presiding over the proceeding may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 20 ch 85 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 46, ch. 85, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 26.05.798.
Retaliation.

A member of the militia who, with the intent to retaliate against a person for reporting or planning to report a criminal offense or for making or planning to make a protected communication, or who, with the intent to discourage any person from reporting a criminal offense or from making or planning to make a protected communication, (1) wrongfully takes or threatens to take an adverse personnel action against a person or (2) wrongfully withholds or threatens to withhold a favorable personnel action with respect to a person may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 20 ch 85 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 46, ch. 85, SLA 2018 makes this section effective July 1, 2018.

Sec. 26.05.800.
Misbehavior before the enemy.

A member of the militia is guilty of misbehavior before the enemy if the member is before or in the presence of the enemy, or is facing a threat as described in AS

26.05.070

, and

runs away;

shamefully abandons, surrenders, or delivers up a command, unit, place, or military property that the member has a duty to defend;

through disobedience, neglect, or intentional misconduct, endangers the safety of the command, unit, place, or military property;

casts away the member’s arms or ammunition;

engages in cowardly conduct;

quits a place of duty to plunder or pillage;

causes false alarms in a command, unit, or place under control of the armed forces of the United States or the militia of the state;

wilfully fails to do the utmost to encounter, engage, capture, or destroy enemy troops, combatants, vessels, aircraft, or other thing that the member has a duty to encounter, engage, capture, or destroy; or

does not afford all practicable relief and assistance to the troops, combatants, vessels, or aircraft of the armed forces of the United States or an ally of the United States, this state, or another state when engaged in battle.

A member found guilty of misbehavior before the enemy under this section may be punished by up to 10 years of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.599; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.805.
Subordinate compelling surrender.

A member of the militia who compels or attempts to compel the commander of the militia of this state or of any other state, of a place, a vessel, an aircraft, or another military property, or of a body of members of the armed forces to give it up to an enemy or to abandon it in the face of a threat described in AS

26.05.070

, or who strikes the colors or flag to an enemy without proper authority, may be punished by up to 10 years of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.600

; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.810.
Improper use of countersign.

A member of the militia who, in time of war, or emergency as described in AS

26.05.070

, discloses the parole or countersign to a person not entitled to receive it or who gives to another person who is entitled to receive and use the parole or countersign a different parole or countersign from that which, to the person’s knowledge, the member was authorized and required to give may be punished by up to 10 years of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.601; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.815.
Forcing a safeguard.

A member of the militia who forces a safeguard may be punished by up to 10 years of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.602; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.820.
Captured or abandoned property.

A member of the militia shall secure all public property taken for the service of the United States or the state and shall give notice and turn over to the proper authority without delay all captured or abandoned property in the member’s possession, custody, or control.

A member of the militia who

fails to carry out the duties prescribed in (a) of this section and buys, sells, trades, or in any way deals in or disposes of taken, captured, or abandoned property, as a result of which the member receives or expects to receive any profit, benefit, or advantage to the member or another person directly or indirectly connected with the member may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct; or

engages in looting or pillaging may be punished by up to 10 years of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.603; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.825.
Aiding the enemy.

A member of the militia who (1) aids or attempts to aid the enemy or a hostile individual or group as described in AS

26.05.070

with arms, ammunition, supplies, money, or other things, or (2) without proper authority, knowingly harbors or protects or gives intelligence to, or communicates or corresponds with or holds any intercourse with, the enemy or hostile individual or group, either directly or indirectly, may be punished by up to 10 years of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.604; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.830.
Misconduct as prisoner.

A member of the militia who, while in the hands of the enemy or a hostile individual or group as described in AS

26.05.070

, (1) for the purpose of securing favorable treatment by the person’s captors, acts without proper authority in a manner contrary to law, custom, or regulation, to the detriment of other persons of whatever nationality held by the enemy or hostile individual or group as civilian or military prisoners, or (2) while in a position of authority over a person, maltreats the person without justifiable cause may be punished by up to 10 years of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.605

; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.833.
Offenses against correctional custody and restriction.

A member of the militia who (1) is placed in correctional custody by a person authorized to do so, (2) is placed under physical restraint while in correctional custody, and (3) escapes from the physical restraint before the member is released from physical restraint by proper authority may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

A member of the militia who (1) is placed in correctional custody by a person authorized to do so, (2) is placed under restraint other than physical restraint while in correctional custody, and (3) goes beyond the limits of the restraint before the member is released from or relieved of the restraint by proper authority may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

A member of the militia who (1) is ordered to be restricted to certain limits by a person authorized to do so and (2) with knowledge of the limits of the restriction, goes beyond the limits before the member is released from the limitations by proper authority may be punished by up to six months of confinement, by separation with characterization up to bad-conduct discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 21 ch 85 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 46, ch. 85, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 26.05.835.
False official statements or oaths.

A member of the militia who, with intent to deceive, signs a false record, return, regulation, order, or other official document made in the line of duty, knowing it to be false, or makes a false official statement in the line of duty, knowing it to be false, may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

A member of the militia who (1) takes an oath that is in a matter in which the oath is required or authorized by law and that is administered by a person who has the authority to administer the oath and (2) makes or subscribes to a statement that is false and that the person does not believe to be true at the time the person takes the oath may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016; am § 22 ch 85 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.607; renumbered in 2016.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, added (b).

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.840.
Military property; loss, damage, destruction, or wrongful disposition.

A member of the militia who, without proper authority, (1) sells or otherwise disposes of, (2) wilfully or through neglect damages, destroys, or loses, or (3) wilfully or through neglect suffers to be lost, damaged, destroyed, sold, or wrongfully disposed of, military property of the United States or of any state, may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.608; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.845.
Property other than military property; waste, spoilage, or destruction.

A member of the militia who wilfully or recklessly wastes, spoils, or otherwise wilfully and wrongly destroys or damages any property other than military property of the United States or of any state may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.609; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.850.
Improper hazarding of vehicle, aircraft, or vessel.

A member of the militia who wilfully and wrongfully hazards or suffers to be hazarded a vehicle, aircraft, or vessel of the armed forces of the United States or the militia of the state may be punished by up to five years of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

A member of the militia who negligently hazards or suffers to be hazarded a vehicle, aircraft, or vessel of the armed forces of the United States or the militia of the state may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.610

; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.855.
Drunken, impaired, or reckless operation of a vehicle, aircraft, or vessel.

A member of the militia who operates or physically controls a nonmilitary vehicle, aircraft, or vessel in a negligent or reckless manner may be punished by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct if the charge is for negligent operation or control, or by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct if the charge is for reckless operation or control. A court-martial may not impose a sentence of confinement under this subsection if the charge is for negligent operation or control.

A member of the militia who (1) operates or physically controls a nonmilitary vehicle, aircraft, or vessel while impaired by a controlled substance, or (2) operates or is in actual physical control of a nonmilitary vehicle, aircraft, or vessel while under the influence of alcohol or when the alcohol concentration in the person’s blood or breath is equal to or exceeds the applicable limit under (d) of this section may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct, or under (e) of this section if the member is not in active duty status at the time of the offense, or by up to five years of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct if the member is in active duty status at the time of the offense.

A member of the militia who (1) operates or physically controls a vehicle, aircraft, or vessel of the armed forces of the United States or the militia of a state in a negligent or reckless manner or while impaired by a controlled substance, or (2) operates or is in actual physical control of a vehicle, aircraft, or vessel of the armed forces of the United States or the militia of a state while under the influence of alcohol or when the alcohol concentration in the person’s blood or breath is equal to or exceeds the applicable limit under (d) of this section may be punished by up to five years of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

For purposes of (b) and (c) of this section,

in the case of the operation or control of a vehicle, aircraft, or vessel in the United States, the applicable limit on the alcohol concentration in a person’s blood or breath is the lesser of

the blood alcohol content limit under the law of the state in which the conduct occurred, except as provided under (3) of this subsection for conduct on a military installation that is in more than one state; and

the blood alcohol content limit under AS

28.35.030

;

in the case of the operation or control of a vehicle, aircraft, or vessel outside the United States, the applicable blood alcohol content limit is 0.10 grams of alcohol for each 100 milliliters of blood with respect to alcohol concentration in a person’s blood and is 0.10 grams of alcohol for each 210 liters of breath with respect to alcohol concentration in a person’s breath, as shown by chemical analysis or a lower limit that the Secretary of Defense may prescribe by regulation;

in the case of a military installation that is in more than one state, if those states have different blood alcohol content limits under their respective state laws, the Secretary of Defense may select one of the blood alcohol content limits to apply uniformly on that installation.

A member of the militia may be punished by up to five years of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct if the member of the militia is convicted under (b) of this section and has been previously convicted two or more times within the 10 years preceding the date of the present offense.

Unless otherwise specifically defined or unless the context otherwise requires, in this section,

“blood alcohol content limit” means the amount of alcohol concentration in a person’s blood or breath at which operation or control of a vehicle, aircraft, or vessel is prohibited;

“nonmilitary” means not of the armed forces of the United States or of the militia of a state;

“state” includes the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the Virgin Islands, Guam, and American Samoa;

“United States” includes the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the Virgin Islands, Guam, and American Samoa.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016; am §§ 23, 24 ch 85 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.611; renumbered in 2016 at which time cross references to other renumbered sections were also corrected.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (b) and (c), substituted “a controlled substance” for “a substance described in AS

26.05.870(c)

” following “impaired by a”.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.860.
Drunkenness and other incapacitating offenses.

A member of the militia, other than a sentinel or lookout, who (1) is found under the influence of alcohol or a controlled substance while on duty, or (2) as a result of the use of any alcoholic beverage or drug, is unable to properly perform the member’s duty may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

A member of the militia who, while a prisoner, is drunk or under the influence of a controlled substance other than a controlled substance taken in accordance with a valid prescription may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016; am §§
25, 26 ch 85 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.612; renumbered in 2016.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (a), inserted “or a controlled substance” following “influence of alcohol” and “, or (2) as a result of the use of any alcoholic beverage or drug, is unable to properly perform the member’s duty” following “while on duty”; added (b).

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.865.
Misbehavior of sentinel.

A sentinel or lookout who (1) as a result of the use of any alcoholic beverage or drug, is unable to properly perform the sentinel’s or lookout’s duties, (2) is found sleeping on the sentinel’s or lookout’s post, (3) leaves the sentinel’s or lookout’s post before being regularly relieved, or (4) loiters or wrongfully sits down on post may be punished, if the offense is committed in time of war or emergency as described in AS

26.05.070

, by confinement of not more than 10 years, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct, but if the offense is committed at any other time, by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016; am § 27 ch 85 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.613; renumbered in 2016.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, inserted “(1) as a result of the use of any alcoholic beverage or drug, is unable to properly perform the sentinel’s or lookout’s duties, (2)” following “A sentinel or lookout who”, deleted “under the influence of alcohol or” following “is found”, inserted “, or (4) loiters or wrongfully sits down on post” following “regularly relieved”.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.867.
Disrespect toward sentinel or lookout.

A member of the militia who, knowing that another person is a sentinel or lookout, uses wrongful and disrespectful language or behaves in a wrongful and disrespectful manner that is directed toward and within the hearing of the sentinel or lookout while the sentinel or lookout is executing the sentinel or lookout’s duties may be punished by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge and by such other punishment, without confinement, as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 28 ch 85 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 46,
ch. 85, SLA 2018 makes this section effective January 1, 2019.

Sec. 26.05.870.
Wrongful use or possession of controlled substances.

A member of the militia who wrongfully uses, possesses, manufactures, distributes, or imports a controlled substance into the customs territory of the United States, exports from the United States in violation of the laws of the United States or the state, or who wrongfully introduces a controlled substance into an installation, vessel, vehicle, or aircraft used by or under the control of the armed forces of the United States or the military forces of a state may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct if the charge is for wrongful use or possession, or by up to five years of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct if the charge is for manufacturing, distributing, or importing.

A court-martial may not impose a sentence of confinement under this section if the charge is for use or possession of marijuana or any marijuana derivative or compound.

[Repealed, § 41 ch 85 SLA 2018.]

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016; am § 41 ch 85 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.614; renumbered in 2016.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, repealed (c).

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.875.
Malingering.

A member of the militia who, for the purpose of avoiding work, duty, or service, (1) feigns illness, physical disablement, mental lapse, or derangement, or (2) intentionally inflicts self-injury may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS

26.05.615

; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.880.
Riot or breach of peace.

A member of the militia who intentionally causes or wilfully participates in a riot or breach of the peace may be punished by up to one year of confinement, by separation with characterization up to dishonorable discharge, and by such other punishment as a court-martial may direct.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.616; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.

Sec. 26.05.885.
Provoking speeches or gestures.

A member of the militia who uses provoking or reproachful words or gestures toward another member of the militia may be punished as a court-martial may direct.

A court-martial may not impose a sentence of confinement or a discharge under this section.

History.

(§ 4 ch 55 SLA 2016)

Revisor's notes. —

This section was enacted as AS 26.05.617; renumbered in 2016.

Effective dates. —

Section 13, ch. 55, SLA 2016, provides that this section is effective July 1, 2016. The Act was approved by the governor on August 6, 2016; therefore, under AS

01.10.070(d)

, this section is effective August 7, 2016.